Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 15

Contracts to Raise and Sell Farm Products

43-15-101. Contracts for period not exceeding three years authorized.

Any person may enter into contract with natural persons or corporations, whereby the person, for a period of one (1) or more years, not exceeding three (3) years, will plant, cultivate, and harvest on such person's farm or plantation any particular crop, either of wheat, corn, or tobacco, or other agricultural product; will plant and cultivate such acreage as the parties may agree; and will prepare it for market, sale, and shipment in any particular manner to be agreed upon as useful, proper, or necessary for the purpose.

Acts 1907, ch. 155, § 1; Shan., § 3193a4; mod. Code 1932, § 7807; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1701.

Cross-References. Agriculture commodities promotion, title 43, ch. 29.

Comparative Legislation. Contracts to raise and sell farm products:

Ala. Code § 2-11-1 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 69-1-101 et seq.

Collateral References.

Choice of law as to applicable statute of limitations in contract actions. 78 A.L.R.3d 639.

Fence as nuisance. 80 A.L.R.3d 962.

Agriculture
3.3-3.6.

Factors
5.

43-15-102. Irrevocable appointment of exclusive agent to sell farm products.

The first person may appoint or designate the other person with whom the first person may contract as the first person's agent; and may invest the agent with authority to decide when and at what price or prices the farm products shall be sold and may appoint the agent the sole and exclusive agent to sell the products.

Such farm products shall not be sold by the owner independent of the agent, or through or by any other agent, and they shall not be delivered for storage to any bailee or depository other than a designated bailee or depository of the agent.

Such agency shall be irrevocable for the time for which it was by the parties entered into.

Acts 1907, ch. 155, § 2; Shan., § 3193a5; mod. Code 1932, § 7808; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1702.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agency, § 87.

43-15-103. Contracts for costs and expenses of agency to be borne proportionately and ratably.

If more than one (1) person appoints or designates the same agent, under similar contracts, with the same powers, the persons may agree in the contracts that they will bear and pay proportionately and ratably, according to the value of their several crops, the costs and expenses of the agency, including warehousing, storing, handling, preparing the crops for market, insurance, and all other legitimate expenses incurred in the handling and sale of the crops.

Acts 1907, ch. 155, § 3; Shan., § 3193a6; mod. Code 1932, § 7809; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1703.

43-15-104. Contracts are binding, irrevocable, and enforceable — Damages for breach.

Every such contract shall be binding and irrevocable by either party, and may be specifically enforced in equity; or, if breached by either party, the injured party may bring suit for damages at law, if the party elects to do so.

Acts 1907, ch. 155, § 4; Shan., § 3193a7; Code 1932, § 7810; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1704.